Massachusetts, session 194th, H3559.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 138 of Chapter 164 of the General Laws, is hereby amended in the
definition of “Class III net metering facility” by adding at the end thereof, the following words:
“; provided further, that a Class III net metering facility that is a solar net metering facility
located on built land may have a generating capacity of more than 1 megawatt but less than or
equal to 5 megawatts.”
SECTION 2. Section 138 of Chapter 164 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
adding the following definitions:
“Disturbed land”, land containing pavement, compacted urban soils, gravel pits,
junkyards, abandoned dumping grounds and other land that is barren of native plant growth due
to human activity prior to January 1, 2024 and land that is part of a parcel containing a building
of 3

and is not and has not been forest or tree covered or used for agriculture or zoned for agriculture
since January 1, 2012.
“Built land”, parking lots over which a solar canopy can be installed, structures,
brownfields, landfills, roadway cuts or disturbed land.
SECTION 3. Section 139(i) of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as amended by chapter 8
of the acts of 2021, and amended by Section 54 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022 is hereby
further amended by adding the following sentence:
A Class I net metering facility on built land with a capacity greater than 25 kilowatts, a
Class II net metering facility on built land or Class III solar net metering facility on built land
shall be exempt from subsections (b1/2) and (k) and from the aggregate net metering capacity of
facilities that are not net metering facilities of a municipality or other governmental entity under
subsection (f) and may net meter and, irrespective of size, accrue Class II net metering credits if
it is generating renewable energy.
SECTION 4. Chapter 75 of the acts of 2016, as amended by section 63 of chapter 179 of
the acts of 2022, is hereby further amended by inserting after 11A the following three new
sections:
Section 11B. The department of energy resources shall promulgate regulations to include
in the solar incentive program established in section 11 and in any successor solar incentive
program, additional adders for solar facilities located on built land, including parking lot
canopies, and remove declining incentive blocks for solar facilities located on built land. The
department of energy resources shall promulgate regulations that allow adjustment of incentives
for solar energy based on market conditions for energy, labor, steel, other materials associated
of 3

with the manufacturing of solar panels, and other solar development cost realities. By December
31, 2025 the department of energy resources and the department of public utilities shall finalize
these changes for built land.
Section 11C. The executive office of environmental affairs shall investigate and report on
appropriate uses of federal funds and funds held in the transitional escrow account, specifically
funds transferred pursuant to section 259 of chapter 268 of the acts of 2022 to the Transitional
Escrow Fund established in section 16 of chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended by section 4
of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022, and any funds remaining in the federal COVID-19 response
fund established in section 2JJJJ of chapter 29 of the General Laws to encourage the equitable
deployment of solar facilities located on built land. The executive office of energy and
environmental affairs shall transmit the report to the house and senate chairs of the joint
committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy, and the chairs of the house and senate
committees on ways and means no later than December 31, 2025.
Section 11D. The Massachusetts Clean Energy Center shall create an incentive for roof
repair or replacement as part of a rooftop solar project if needed to make solar an economically
sound choice, either as a grant program or a feed in tariff via the solar incentive program
established in section 11 and in any successor solar incentive program, with priority for buildings
in environmental justice communities. By December 31, 2025 the Massachusetts Clean Energy
Center shall implement an incentive.
SECTION 5. By December 31, 2025 the department of public utilities shall implement
SECTION 3.
of 3